Washington statutes.
RCW 6.27.110

Service of writ generally—Forms—Requirements for person serving writ—Return.

(1) Service of the writ of garnishment, including a writ for continuing lien on earnings, on the garnishee is invalid unless the writ is served together with: (a) An answer form as prescribed in RCW 6.27.190; and (b) a check or money order made payable to the garnishee in the amount of twenty dollars for the answer fee if the writ of garnishment is not a writ for a continuing lien on earnings.

(2) Except as provided in RCW 6.27.080 for service on a bank, savings and loan association, or credit union, the writ of garnishment shall be mailed to the garnishee by certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed in the same manner as a summons in a civil action, and will be binding upon the garnishee on the day set forth on the return receipt. In the alternative, the writ shall be served by the sheriff of the county in which the garnishee lives or has its place of business or by any person qualified to serve process in the same manner as a summons in a civil action is served.

(3) If a writ of garnishment is served by a sheriff, the sheriff shall file with the clerk of the court that issued the writ a signed return showing the time, place, and manner of service and that the writ was accompanied by an answer form, and check or money order if required by this section, and noting thereon fees for making the service. If service is made by any person other than a sheriff, such person shall file an affidavit including the same information and showing qualifications to make such service. If a writ of garnishment is served by mail, the person making the mailing shall file an affidavit showing the time, place, and manner of mailing and that the writ was accompanied by an answer form, and check or money order if required by this section, and shall attach the return receipt or electronic return receipt delivery confirmation to the affidavit.

[ 2012 c 159 s 6; 1998 c 227 s 4; 1997 c 296 s 4; 1988 c 231 s 26; 1987 c 442 s 1011; 1981 c 193 s 5; 1971 ex.s. c 292 s 8; 1970 ex.s. c 61 s 11; 1969 ex.s. c 264 s 13. Formerly RCW 7.33.130.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. SPR 91.04W(a), (b), and (e).

Severability—1988 c 231: See note following RCW 6.01.050.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 292: See note following RCW 26.28.010.